Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 2. Cardiopulmonary Resuscitation Directives

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety of, and liability related to, issuance or enforcement of Do Not Resuscitate (DNR) orders, 46 ALR5th 793.

§§ 35-22-201 through 35-22-208.
Definitions. [Repealed effective July 1, 2016]

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 108, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 189, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.